Indiana, session 2026, HB1228.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-38-2.7-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.84-2022,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Except as described in subsection (b), the
following are immune from civil liability for an act or omission that
occurs in connection with the implementation of this chapter:
(1) A judge who:
(A) oversees a case; or
(B) makes an order;
related to electronic monitoring.
(1) (2) A supervising agency.
(2) (3) A law enforcement agency.
(3) (4) An employee of a person described in subdivisions (1)
through (2). (3).
(b) The immunity described in subsection (a) does not apply if the
person committed gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
2026 IN 1228—LS 6464/DI 151